CIK: 1180145
Company Name: CARDIOVASCULAR SYSTEMS INC
Form Type : 10-K
Filing Date: 2014-08-28
Accession Number: 0001180145-14-000030


Item 1 Business. Special Note Regarding Forward Looking Statements This report contains plans, intentions, objectives, estimates and expectations that constitute forward looking statements within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act ), which are subject to the safe harbor created by those sections. Forward looking statements are based on our management beliefs and assumptions and on information currently available to our management. In some cases, you can identify forward looking statements by terms such as may, will, should, could, would, expect, plans, anticipates, believes, estimates, projects, predicts, potential and similar expressions intended to identify forward looking statements. Examples of these statements include, but are not limited to, any statements regarding our future financial performance, results of operations or sufficiency of capital resources to fund our operating requirements, and other statements that are other than statements of historical fact. Our actual results could differ materially from those discussed in these forward looking statements due to a number of factors, including the risks and uncertainties that are described more fully by us in , Item 1A and I, Item 7 of this report and in our other filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. You should not place undue reliance on these forward looking statements, which apply only as of the date of this report. You should read this report completely and with the understanding that our actual future results may be materially different from what we expect. Except as required by law, we assume no obligation to update these forward looking statements publicly, or to update the reasons actual results could differ materially from those anticipated in these forward looking statements, even if new information becomes available in the future. Corporate Information We were incorporated as Replidyne, Inc. ("Replidyne") in Delaware in 2000. On February 25, 2009, Replidyne completed its business combination with Cardiovascular Systems, Inc., a Minnesota corporation, in accordance with the terms of the Agreement and Plan of Merger and Reorganization, dated as of November 3, 2008. At the effective time of the merger, Replidyne changed its name to Cardiovascular Systems, Inc. ("CSI"). Our principal executive office is located at 651 Campus Drive, St. Paul, Minnesota 55112 Our teleph1 number is (651) 259 1600, and our website is www.csi360.com . The information contained in or accessible through our website is not incorporated by reference into, and should not be considered part of, this Annual Report on Form 10 K. We have received 19 federal registrations in the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office ("USPTO") of certain marks, including Diamondback , CSI , Predator 360 , Stealth 360 , a first CSI logo, a second CSI logo, Lumen Library , ViperWire , ViperWire Advance , Viperslide , ViperTrack , ViperCaddy , Stealth 360 , Diamondback 360 , Diamondback 360 (Stylized) Logo, and Stay A Step Ahead of PAD . We have applied for federal trademark registration with the USPTO of certain marks, including Viperslide (Stylized), Vipertrack (Stylized), Viperwire Advance (Stylized). All other trademarks, trade names and service marks appearing in this Form 10 K are the property of their respective owners. Business Overview We are a medical technology company leading the way in the effort to successfully treat patients suffering from peripheral and coronary artery diseases, including those with arterial calcium, the most difficult disease to treat. Our employees devote every day to developing and commercializing innovative solutions that help physicians save limbs and lives when facing this difficult disease state. We are committed to clinical rigor, constant innovation and a defining drive to set the industry standard to deliver safe and effective medical devices that improve lives. We have developed a patented orbital atherectomy technology for peripheral and coronary commercial applications. Our peripheral arterial disease systems are catheter based platforms capable of treating a broad range of plaque types in leg arteries both above and below the knee and address many of the limitations associated with other treatment alternatives. We refer to our Stealth 360 Peripheral Orbital Atherectomy System ("OAS") ("Stealth 360") and the Diamondback 360 Peripheral OAS ("Diamondback 360 Peripheral"), collectively, in this annual report as the "PAD Systems." 1 The U.S. Food and Drug Administration ("FDA") granted us 510(k) clearance for the following PAD Systems as a therapy in patients with peripheral artery disease ("PAD") FDA 510(k) Clearance Granted Product Commercial Introduction August 2007 Diamondback 360 Peripheral September 2007 March 2009 Predator 360 April 2009 March 2011 Stealth 360 March 2011 March 2014 Diamondback 360 60cm Peripheral OAS April 2014 As of June 30, 2014, over 155,000 of our PAD Systems have been sold to leading institutions across the United States. Sales of PAD Systems during the fiscal year ended June 30, 2014 represented 84% of revenue. Our coronary product, the Diamondback 360 Coronary OAS ("CAD System"), is a catheter based platform designed to facilitate stent delivery in patients with coronary artery disease ("CAD") who are acceptable candidates for PTCA or stenting due to de novo , severely calcified coronary artery lesions. The CAD System design is similar to technology used in our PAD Systems, customized specifically for the coronary application. In October 2013, we received PMA approval from the FDA to market the CAD System as a treatment for severely calcified coronary arteries. We commenced a commercial launch that same month and as of June 30, 2014, nearly 1,400 patients across the United States have benefited from the use of our coronary technology. Sales of CAD Systems during the fiscal year ended June 30, 2014 represented approximately 4% of revenue. In addition to the PAD and CAD Systems, we intend to expand our product portfolio through internal product development and establishment of business relationships with other medical device companies. We offer multiple accessory products designed to complement the use of the PAD and CAD Systems, and we have an exclusive distribution agreement with Asahi Intecc Co., Ltd. to market its peripheral guidewire line in the United States. Sales of complementary products, primarily guidewire sales, represented 12% of revenue during the fiscal year ended June 30, 2014. Market Overview Peripheral Artery Disease Peripheral artery disease ("PAD") is a circulatory problem in which plaque deposits build up on the walls of the arteries, which can result in inadequate blood flow to the limbs. Arteries above the knee are generally long, straight and relatively wide compared to arteries below the knee, which tend to be shorter and branch into arteries that are progressively smaller in diameter. The most common early symptoms of PAD are pain, cramping or fatigue in the leg or hip muscles while walking. Symptoms may progress to include numbness, tingling or weakness in the leg and, in severe cases, burning or aching pain in the leg, foot or toes while resting. As PAD progresses, additional signs and symptoms occur, including cooling or color changes in the skin of the legs or feet, and wounds or sores on the legs or feet that will not heal. If left untreated, PAD may continue to progress and lead to Critical Limb Ischemia ("CLI"), a condition in which the amount of oxygenated blood being delivered to the limb is insufficient to keep the tissue alive. CLI may lead to large non healing ulcers, infections, gangrene, limb amputation or death. Untreated CLI eventually results in an estimated 160,000 amputations per year. A study by Dr. Miguel Montero Baker et al. concluded that a traditional antegrade recanalization attempt can fail in up to 20% of the cases (Montero Baker et al. "Retrograde Approach for Complex Popliteal and Tibioper1al Occlusions," J Endovasc Therapy, 2008). There are 2 primary references used for estimating PAD prevalence the patient Ankle Brachial Index ("ABI") or diabetes rates. The most recent comprehensive study, based on ABI, estimates the U.S. prevalence at 8.5 million (Allison et al, Ethnic Specific Prevalence of Peripheral Arterial Disease in the United States, Circulation, 2007). Alternatively, a study by The SAGE Group, based on the diabetes method, estimates prevalence at 17.6 million in 2010 (The SAGE Group, "The Diabetes Method," 2011). An aging population, coupled with increasing incidence of diabetes and obesity, is likely to continue to increase the prevalence of PAD. In many older PAD patients, particularly those with diabetes, PAD is characterized by fibrotic (moderately hard) or calcified (extremely hard) plaque deposits that can be very challenging to treat. Although we believe the rate of PAD diagnoses is increasing, it is believed that under diagnosis continues, due to patients failing to display symptoms or physicians misinterpreting symptoms as normal aging. Emphasis on PAD education from industry, medical associations, insurance companies and other groups, coupled with publications in medical journals and public news channels, is increasing physician and patient awareness of PAD risk factors, symptoms, and treatment options. In a Dr. Gary Mintz et al. angiography study, 1,155 native vessel target lesions in 1,117 patients were studied by intravascular ultrasound ("IVUS") and coronary angiography. The presences, magnitude, location, and distribution of IVUS calcium were analyzed and compared with the detection and classification (n1 mild, moderate, and severe) by angiography. Angiography detected calcium in 440 of 1,155 2 lesions (38%) 306 (26%) moderate calcium and 134 (12%) severe calcium. The distribution of these lesions are classified as above the knee ("ATK"), at the knee or below the knee ("BTK"). According to our CONFIRM Post Market Clinical Registry Series, which were designed to further evaluate acute parameters related to the use of the PAD Systems, 46% of the disease is ATK, 16% behind the knee and 36% BTK. As a result of additional clinical trial outcomes, new 2011 guidelines from the American College of Cardiology Foundation American Heart Association lowered the recommended age for testing for PAD from 70 to 65, or 50 if the patient has a history of smoking or diabetes. As these guidelines are incorporated into physician practice, PAD diagnosis rates are forecasted to increase. Physicians manage a significant portion of the PAD diagnosed population by recommending lifestyle changes, such as diet and exercise, and by prescribing prescription drugs. While medications, diet and exercise may improve blood flow, they do not treat the underlying obstruction and many patients have difficulty maintaining lifestyle changes. As a result of these challenges, many medically managed patients develop more severe symptoms that require procedural intervention. Coronary Artery Disease Coronary artery disease ("CAD") is a life threatening condition and leading cause of death in men and women in the United States. CAD occurs when a fatty material called plaque builds up on the walls of arteries that supply blood to the heart. The plaque buildup causes the arteries to harden and narrow (atherosclerosis), reducing blood flow. The risk of CAD increases if a person has 1 or more of the following high blood pressure, abnormal cholesterol levels, diabetes, or family history of early heart disease. According to the American Heart Association, 16.3 million people in the United States have been diagnosed with CAD, the most common form of heart disease. Heart disease claims more than 600,000 lives in the United States each year. According to estimates, significant arterial calcium is present in nearly 40% of patients undergoing a percutaneous coronary intervention ("PCI"). Significant calcium contributes to poor outcomes and higher treatment costs in coronary interventions when traditional therapies are used, including a significantly higher occurrence of death and major adverse cardiac events ("MACE"). Our PAD and CAD Systems Our OAS represents an innovative approach to the treatment of PAD and CAD that provides physicians and patients with a procedure that addresses many of the limitations of traditional treatment alternatives. Each of the OAS utilize single use catheters that incorporate a flexible drive shaft with an offset diamond grit coated crown. Physicians position the crown at the site of an arterial plaque containing lesion and remove the plaque by positioning the crown to orbit against it, creating a smooth lumen, or channel, in the vessel. The OAS are designed to differentiate between hard plaque and soft, compliant arterial tissue, a concept that we refer to as differential sanding. The diamond grit coated crown preferentially engages and sands the harder material, but is designed not to damage more compliant parts of the artery. The Peripheral OAS also treats soft plaque, which is still harder than a normal vessel wall. Comp1nts of the OAS Our OAS uses a single use, low profile catheter that travels over our proprietary guidewires and is powered by a saline infusion. The PAD System reduces plaque on peripheral vessel walls by using a rotating, diamond coated crown within peripheral arteries. Similarly, the CAD System uses the same method to reduce severely calcified plaque on coronary vessel walls within coronary arteries in order to facilitate stent delivery. Catheter. The catheter for our OAS consists of a control handle, which allows movement of the crown and predictable crown location; a flexible drive shaft with a diamond grit coated offset crown, which tracks and orbits over the guidewire; and a sheath, which covers the drive shaft and permits delivery of saline or medications to the treatment area. ViperWire Advance Guidewire and ViperWire Advance Coronary Guidewire. The ViperWire guidewires were designed to offer an improved ability to maneuver through tortuous, twisting blood vessels and cross challenging lesions. The OAS travels over this wire to the lesion and operate on this wire. ViperSlide Lubricant. ViperSlide is an exclusive lubricant designed to optimize the smooth operation of the OAS. Saline Infusion Pump. The saline infusion pump mounts directly to the intravenous pole and bathes the OAS shaft and crown and provides an electric power supply for the operation of the catheter. The constant flow of saline reduces the risk of heat generation and improves the flush of particulates. 3 The mechanism of action is a function of the centrifugal force generated by the OAS as they rotate. As the speed of the crown's rotation increases, it creates centrifugal force, which increases the crown's orbit and presses the diamond grit coated offset crown against the lesion or plaque, removing a small amount of plaque with each orbit. The characteristics of the orbit and the resulting lumen size can be adjusted by modifying 2 variables Speed. An increase in speed creates a larger orbital circle, thus accommodating larger diameter vessels. Our current PAD Systems allow the user to choose between 3 rotational speeds. Our CAD System allows the user to choose between 2 rotational speeds. Crown Characteristics. The crowns for the OAS are designed with various weights (as determined by crown geometry and material density) and are coated with diamond grit. The PAD System crowns are available in 2 configurations classic and solid. Physicians select crown sizes and configurations based on several case criteria, including reference vessel size, lesion length and degree of stenosis, stenosis morphology, and anatomy tortuosity. Physicians often use the classic crown configuration in small, more tortuous vessels or when less aggressive sanding is desired. The solid crown configuration is designed with a tapered, leading edge for frontal sanding, which can be used in tight calcified disease. The PAD Systems are available with a 150 millimeter and 200 millimeter classic crown, and 125 millimeter, 150 millimeter and 200 millimeter solid crown configuration. There is also a 125 millimeter solid micro crown available with the Diamondback 360 Peripheral device, which is designed to provide hybrid performance between the classic and solid configurations designed to treat very small arteries in the lower leg and foot. Catheter lengths are either 145 centimeters or 60 centimeters, which address procedural approach and target lesion locations both above and below the knee and now below the ankle. The shorter length catheters are designed for the retrograde pedal approach as opposed to the common femoral artery access point. The PAD Systems are versatile in that by adjusting 1 or more of the speeds in conjunction with crown selection, multiple lesions and vessel sizes can be treated. The crown for the CAD System is available in 1 configuration 125 millimeter classic. As the crown moves outward, the centrifugal force is offset by the counterforce exerted by the arterial wall. Normal arteries are compliant and have the ability to expand and contract as needed to supply blood flow. If the tissue is compliant, it flexes away, rather than generating an opposing force that would allow the OAS to engage and sand the wall. Diseased tissue provides resistance and is able to generate an opposing force that allows the OAS to engage and sand the plaque. The sanded plaque is broken down into particles generally smaller than circulating red blood cells that are washed away downstream with the patient's natural blood flow. PAD System testing performed in carbon blocks, animal and cadaver models showed greater than 93% of particles were smaller than a red blood cell, and greater than 99% of particles were smaller than the lumen of the capillaries (which provide the connection between the arterial and venous system). The small particle size minimizes the risk of vascular bed overload, or a saturation of the peripheral or coronary vessels with large particles, which may cause slow or reduced blood flow. The small size of the particles allow them to be managed by the body's natural cleansing of the blood, including various types of white blood cells that eliminate worn out cells and other debris in the bloodstream. We believe the OAS offer the following key benefits Strong Safety Profile Differential Sanding Reduces Risk of Adverse Events. The OAS are designed to differentiate between hard plaque and soft compliant arterial tissue. Arteries are composed of 3 tissue layers. The diamond grit coated offset crown at the working end of the devices engages and removes plaque from the artery wall with minimal likelihood of penetrating or damaging the fragile, inner layer of the arterial wall because soft, compliant tissue flexes away from the crown. Furthermore, the OAS have rarely penetrated the middle or outer layers of the artery's wall. The Diamondback 360 Peripheral's perforation rate was 16% during our pivotal OASIS trial. Analysis by an independent pathology laboratory of more than 434 consecutive cross sections of porcine arteries treated with the Diamondback 360 Peripheral revealed there was minimal to no damage, on average, to the middle layer, which is typically associated with restenosis. Similarly, the CAD System perforation rate was 18% during our pivotal ORBIT II trial. Analysis by an independent pathology laboratory of more than 443 patients enrolled in the ORBIT II Trial revealed 4 patients had a perforation after the OAS treatment and another 4 patients had a perforation after stent deployment, for a total of 8 perforations reported. 4 Eliminates Need for Distal Protection. The small size of the particles produced during sanding avoids the need for plaque collection reservoirs on the catheter and reduces the need for ancillary distal protection devices, commonly used with directional cutting atherectomy devices, and also significantly reduces the risk that larger pieces of removed plaque will block blood flow downstream. Allows Continuous Blood Flow During Procedure. The OAS allow for continuous blood flow during the procedure, except when initially used in chronic total occlusions. Other devices may restrict blood flow due to the size of the catheter required or the use of distal protection devices, which could result in complications such as excessive heat and tissue damage. Proven Efficacy Efficacy Demonstrated for Both PAD and CAD Systems. Our pivotal OASIS clinical trial was a prospective 20 center study that involved 124 patients with 201 lesions treated by the Diamondback 360 PAD System. Performance targets were established cooperatively with the FDA before the trial began. Despite 55% of the lesions consisting of calcified plaque, the Diamondback 360 Peripheral successfully met the FDA's study endpoints. Because the Predator 360 and Stealth 360 mechanism of action is identical to that of the Diamondback 360 Peripheral, no additional efficacy trials were required by the FDA for 510(k) clearance of either PAD System. For the CAD System, our ORBIT II coronary OAS trial was designed to evaluate the safety and efficacy of OAS in treating severely calcified coronary lesions. The trial met both the primary safety and efficacy endpoints by significant margins. Preparation of severely calcified plaque with the OAS not only helped facilitate stent delivery, but also improved both acute and 30 day clinical outcomes compared with the outcomes of historic control subjects in this difficult to treat patient population. The pre procedure mean minimal lumen diameter of 0.5 mm increased to 29 mm after the procedure. The primary safety endpoint was 89.6% freedom from 30 day MACE compared with the performance goal of 83%. The primary efficacy endpoint (residual stenosis <50% post stent without in hospital major adverse cardiac events) was 88.9% compared with the performance goal of 82%. Stent delivery was successful in 97.7% of cases; <50% stenosis was observed in 98.6% of subjects. Low rates of in hospital Q wave myocardial infarction (0.7%), cardiac death (0.2%), and target vessel revascularization (0.7%) were reported. Treats Difficult, Fibrotic and Calcified Lesions. The OAS enable physicians to remove plaque from long, fibrotic, calcified or bifurcated lesions, as well as lesions with softer plaque, in peripheral arteries both above and below the knee. Orbital Motion Improves Lesion Compliance. The orbiting action of the OAS removes the hard plaque in the artery by sanding. As the crown sands away the plaque, the lumen of the artery is opened and the vessel wall becomes more compliant. The orbital motion and speed of the crown increases, thus allowing for continuous removal of plaque as the opening of the lumen increases during the operation of the devices. Differential Sanding Creates Smooth Lumens. The differential sanding of the OAS creates a smooth surface lumen, or channel, inside the vessel. We believe that the smooth lumens created by the device increase the velocity of blood flow and decrease the resistance to blood flow, which may decrease the potential for restenosis, or renarrowing of the arteries. Ease of Use Utilizes Familiar Techniques. Physicians using the OAS employ techniques similar to those used in angioplasty, which are familiar to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists who are trained in endovascular techniques. The devices' simple user interfaces require minimal additional training. Single Insertion to Complete Treatment. The orbital technology and differential sanding process of the OAS allows for a single insertion to treat lesions, in most cases. Because the particles of plaque sanded away are of such small sizes, the OASs do not require a collection reservoir that needs to be repeatedly emptied or cleaned during the procedure, or add time and cost to the procedure. Rather, the OAS allow for multiple passes of the device over the lesion until plaque is removed and a smooth lumen is created. 5 Multiple Applications The unique OAS mechanism of action used in both the PAD and CAD Systems can be used to treat multiple anatomic locations. Below the Knee and Behind the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Arteries below and behind the knee have small diameters and may be diffusely diseased, calcified or both, and reaching and treating these small vessels requires a small form factor which eliminates several competitive devices from being an option. Behind the knee lesions also present challenges if a stent is used because stents frequently fracture due to the forces exerted on the vessels when the knee bends or flexes. The PAD Systems are effective in both soft and calcified vessels. This was demonstrated in the Orbital Atherectomy System for the Treatment of Peripheral Vascular Stenosis ("OASIS") trial, where 94.5% of lesions treated with the Diamondback 360 Peripheral were behind or below the knee. The recently introduced Diamondback 360 60cm Peripheral OAS offers a shorter shaft length and a smaller profile and a more flexible shaft than their predecessors for improved ease of use. This product uses a 4 French catheter which enables physicians to access lesions below the knee using retrograde access (access through the ankle or foot). Above the Knee Peripheral Artery Disease. Arteries above the knee are typically longer, straighter and wider than below the knee vessels. Plaque in these arteries may also be diffuse, fibrotic and calcific. Physicians often use higher speeds or larger crown sizes of our products to treat lesions above the knee. Coronary Artery Disease. CAD occurs when a fatty material called plaque builds up on the walls of arteries that supply blood to the heart. The plaque buildup causes the arteries to harden and narrow (atherosclerosis), reducing blood flow. Cost and Time Efficient Procedure Short Procedure Time. The OAS has a short treatment time, typically less than 2 minutes. Single Crown Can Create Various Lumen Sizes Limiting Hospital Inventory Costs. The OAS orbital mechanism of action allow 1 device to create various diameter lumens inside the artery. Adjusting the rotational speed of the crown changes the orbit to create the desired lumen diameter, thereby potentially avoiding the need to use multiple catheters of different sizes to treat multiple lesions. Single Insertion May Reduce Procedural Time. Since the physician does not need to insert and remove multiple catheters or clean a plaque collection reservoir to complete the procedure, there is a potential for decreased procedure time. Our OAS Strategy Our goal is to be the leading provider of minimally invasive solutions for the treatment of peripheral and coronary disease. The key elements of our strategy include Drive Adoption through Our Direct Sales Organization and Key Opinion Leaders. We expect to continue to drive adoption of the OAS through our direct sales force in both hospital and office based lab settings, which targets interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons, and interventional radiologists. As a key element of our strategy, we focus on educating and training physicians on the OAS through our direct sales force and through seminars where physician industry leaders discuss case studies and treatment techniques using the devices. Collect Additional Clinical Evidence on Benefits of the OAS. Physicians are increasingly requesting clinical study evidence to allow them to make the best treatment decisions to achieve the best possible short term and long term outcomes for their patients. We are focused on collecting and using clinical evidence to demonstrate the advantages of the OAS and drive physician acceptance. Enhance OAS and Expand Product Portfolio within the Market for Treatment of Peripheral and Coronary Arteries. In addition to enhancing the OAS, we have expanded our product portfolio. We offer multiple accessory devices designed to complement the use of the OAS. We are continuing to evaluate internal product development to further expand our portfolio of PAD and CAD treatment solutions. 6 Expand Internationally. With CE Mark expected for both the PAD and CAD Systems in fiscal 2015 and the anticipated coronary approval for the next generation coronary OAS device in Japan during the 2016 2017 timeframe, we are evaluating a variety of options for international expansion to maximize the coronary and peripheral market opportunities. Sales channels will be based on specific country dynamics. As a result, distributors including potential strategic partners and direct sales channels are being evaluated. Pursue Strategic Acquisitions and Partnerships. In August 2009, we signed an exclusive distribution agreement with Asahi to market 2 peripheral guidewire lines in the United States. In August 2011, we signed an amendment to expand the agreement to include 3 additional peripheral guidewires. The product portfolio now includes the Treasure Floppy and Regalia and 3 specialty wires Astato 20, Astato 30, and Treasure 12 In June 2013, we signed an amendment to extend the exclusive guidewire agreement 2 more years. Healthcare Policy and Reimbursements. Our healthcare policy initiatives are targeted at raising awareness with public and private payors along with key medical societies on the clinical and economic issues associated with peripheral and coronary arterial calcium. Working with payors and medical societies over time will sustain coverage for our OAS technology and ensure practice guidelines include appropriate treatment options for patients with arterial calcium. In addition to adding to our product portfolio through internal development efforts, we intend to continue to explore the acquisition of other product lines, technologies or companies that may leverage our sales force or complement our strategic objectives. We plan to continue to evaluate distribution agreements, licensing transactions, and other strategic partnerships. Clinical Studies Summary We are committed to providing relevant clinical evidence that enables physicians to select and utilize the best treatment options for their patients. Our clinical studies incorporate rigorous long term clinical and healthcare economic data that are critical to improve long term patient care and ongoing healthcare changes. We have conducted 14 clinical studies to demonstrate the safety and efficacy of the PAD Systems. A total of 3,777 patients were enrolled in various studies including our PAD I and PAD II pilot studies, OASIS pivotal study, CONFIRM post market registries, the CALCIUM 360 , COMPLIANCE 360 and CLARITY post market, randomized feasibility studies, the TRUTH post market study, and multiple physician sponsored studies. The results of these studies consistently demonstrated that the PAD Systems provide predictable, repeatable and durable results that differentiate themselves from other PAD treatments. The following are PAD clinical studies completed or in process during fiscal 2014 OASIS. In September 2005 our IDE was approved to begin OASIS, our pivotal U.S. study. OASIS was a 124 patient, 20 center, prospective study that began enrollment in January 2006. The primary efficacy study endpoint was absolute plaque reduction of the target lesions from baseline to immediately post procedure. The primary safety endpoint was the cumulative incidence of Serious Adverse Events ("SAE") at 30 days. In the OASIS study, 94.5% of lesions treated were behind or below the knee, an area where lesions have traditionally g1 untreated until they require bypass surgery or amputation. Of the lesions treated in OASIS, 55% were comprised of calcified plaque, which presents a challenge to proper expansion and apposition of balloons and stents, and 48% were diffuse, or greater than 3 cm in length. Results of OASIS exceeded FDA pre specified acceptance criteria with an overall plaque reductions of 59.4%, freedom from SAE of 95.2% device related and 90.3% overall and freedom from TLR of 97.6%. TRUTH. A prospective, single arm (non randomized), post market study that used IVUS imaging and angiography to assess procedural outcomes in patients who have symptomatic peripheral artery disease who are treated with the Sponsor's OAS and adjunctive balloon angioplasty. An independent IVUS Core Lab was used to provide adjudicated analyses for IVUS outcomes. CLARITY. A pilot study designed to identify the clinically appropriate endpoint(s) of a larger, statistically powered pivotal trial for treatment of patients with CLI. LIBERTY 360 . We are currently enrolling up to 1,200 patients in our LIBERTY 360 clinical PAD study, which is a prospective, observational, multi center clinical study to evaluate acute and long term clinical, quality of life and economic outcomes of endovascular device intervention in patients with distal outflow peripheral arterial disease. This study is designed with unique endpoints to demonstrate how the PAD Systems provide effective long term clinical and economic outcomes compared to other treatment alternatives. 7 CAD, the most common form of heart disease, continues to grow significantly worldwide. Performing PCI on calcified lesions can lead to MACE rates as high as 24% at 30 days, stent malposition, and a number of procedural complications. Despite being a relatively common problem, there have been no FDA Investigational Device Exemption ("IDE") premarket approval ("PMA") trials studying only patients with severe coronary calcification, before our ORBIT I and ORBIT II trials. ORBIT I. The ORBIT I feasibility study evaluated performance of the Diamondback 360 for the treatment of de novo calcified coronary lesions. The ORBIT I study completed in India in 2009 enrolled 50 patients. The endpoints were measured by device performance, MACE rate, and TLR at six months. Device performance success was 98%. The freedom from MACE at 30 days and at 6 months was 94% and 92% respectively. The 30 day and 6 month freedom from TLR was 98%. A single center follow up of 33 patients demonstrated a freedom MACE of 79% at five year follow up as presented at Society for Cardiovascular Angiography and Interventions in May 2014. ORBIT II. In 2010, we began the ORBIT II pivotal study in the U.S, evaluating the use of the CAD System in treating coronary arteries and in October 2013, we received PMA from the FDA. 1 year ORBIT II study revascularization rate was significantly lower compared to historic controls with a freedom from cardiac death of 97% in this difficult to treat population and freedom from target lesion revascularization ("TLR") of 95%. We continue to expand our coronary clinical data with long term clinical and economic data demonstrating positive results for patients treated with the CAD System. ORBIT II 1 year patient follow up was completed in fiscal 2014. The results were presented at Cardiovascular Research Technologies conference as a Late Breaking Clinical Trial in February 2014. Results demonstrated a freedom from TLR rate of 95.3% and freedom from MACE rate of 836% in this difficult to treat patient population of severe calcified coronary lesions. An economic analysis was also completed that demonstrated a reduction in average length of stay of 244 days compared to the MedPAR average length of stay with a 414.4 code of 4.24 days. The average savings was $4,294 per patient, based on the ORBIT II inpatient economic data of the index procedure costs and the 30 day procedure related readmission costs. A subsequent economic analysis of ORBIT II economic data using both outpatient and inpatient data resulted in an average savings of $3,200 per patient. Ongoing Clinical Studies in Fiscal 2014 MACE. The MACE study is a post market coronary multi center, prospective study to evaluate major adverse coronary events along with TLR and perforations in the treatment of moderate to severely calcified coronary lesions. This registry will include commercially available devices for revascularization involving stent deployment in de novo coronary lesions. The data from this registry will demonstrate the rate of calcification in the real world setting as well as examine health care resource utilization. Enrollment in the 500 patient study has begun at up to 50 U.S. sites. These patients will be followed up to 3 years. COAST . This is a prospective, single arm, multi center, global study designed to evaluate performance of the Diamondback 360 Coronary Micro Crown OAS. This study expands on the already effective current Diamondback 360 Coronary OAS to evaluate the next generation coronary OAS coronary device globally. We have begun enrolling up to 100 subjects at up to 15 U.S. sites and five sites in Japan. Minimum enrollment is 50 patients in the U.S. and 25 in Japan. Sales and Marketing We market and sell our products through a direct sales force in the United States. Revenues for the PAD and CAD Systems for fiscal 2014 , fiscal 2013 and fiscal 2012 were $120.4 million , $912 million and $730 million , respectively. We have targeted sales and marketing efforts to interventional cardiologists, vascular surgeons and interventional radiologists with experience using similar catheter based procedures, such as angioplasty, stenting, and cutting or laser atherectomy. Peer to peer education is a key element of our sales strategy. We target our marketing efforts to practiti1rs through physician education, medical conferences, seminars, peer reviewed journals and marketing materials. Our sales and marketing program focuses on educating physicians regarding the proper use and application of the OAS; clinical results showing safety and efficacy of products; educating physicians on the prevalence and complications of calcium in PAD and CAD; and developing relationships with key opinion leaders. We are not currently marketing our products internationally; however, we continue to evaluate international opportunities. 8 Research and Development Our research and development efforts are focused in the development of products to penetrate our 3 key target markets below and behind the knee, above the knee, and coronary vessels. In additional to the key target markets, we also focus on alternative access sites. Research and development projects include the development of new products, enhancement of existing products, and PAD and CAD clinical trials. Research and development expenses for fiscal 2014 , fiscal 2013 and fiscal 2012 were $211 million , $15.2 million and $114 million , respectively. Manufacturing We use internally manufactured and externally sourced comp1nts to manufacture the OAS. Most of the externally sourced comp1nts are available from multiple suppliers; however, certain key comp1nts, including the diamond grit coated crown, and our ViperSlide Lubricant are single sourced. We have strategies and arrangements in place for procuring our key comp1nts from alternative suppliers in the event that 1 or more of our single source suppliers were to discontinue supplying us with a key comp1nt. We assemble the shaft, crown and handle comp1nts on site, and test, pack, seal and label the finished assembly before sending the packaged product to a contract sterilization facility. Upon return from the sterilizer, the product is held in inventory prior to shipping to our customers. Our manufacturing facility in Minnesota, including the shaft manufacturing and the controlled environment assembly areas, is equipped to accommodate approximately 30,000 devices per shift annually. It also has storage capacity for approximately 8,000 devices and 100 saline infusion pumps. Our Pearland, Texas facility is 46,000 square feet and includes a custom built clean room and production space for future expansion of value add processes, including machining and electronics assembly. The facility, when it becomes fully staffed and equipped, will have the capacity to produce approximately 75,000 devices per shift annually. This facility has finished goods storage capacity for greater than 15,000 OAS devices and other accessory products and over 500 Stealth 360 and Diamondback 360 saline infusion pumps. We are underway with the construction of a new, 125,000 square foot, 2 story building in Minnesota that will have space for more than 500 employees and contain dedicated research and development, training and education, and manufacturing facilities. The operations dedicated space will expand our production and inventory capacity significantly. Depending on staffing scale, the new facility will have the capacity to produce in excess of 75,000 devices per shift annually. The finished goods storage capacity for nearly 20,000 devices and more than 500 saline infusion pumps, as well as other accessory products. Occupancy of the new facility is expected to commence in March 2015, with full transfer of operations by December 2015. We believe that our current facilities, including the new corporate headquarters, are substantially adequate for our current and anticipated future needs for the foreseeable future. We are registered with the FDA as a medical device manufacturer. We have opted to maintain quality assurance and quality management certifications to enable us to market our products in the member states of the European Union, the European Free Trade Association and countries that have entered into Mutual Recognition Agreements with the European Union. We are ISO 134852003 certified, and our renewal is due by December 2015. Under these registrations, our plants are audited by FDA and our Notified Body for the EU CE mark. Third Party Reimbursement and Pricing Third party payors, including private insurers, and government insurance programs, such as Medicare and Medicaid, pay for a significant portion of patient care provided in the United States. The single largest payor in the United States is the Medicare program, a federal governmental health insurance program administered by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services ("CMS"). Medicare covers certain medical care expenses for eligible elderly and disabled individuals, including a large percentage of the population with PAD and CAD who could be treated with the OAS. In addition, private insurers often follow the coverage and reimbursement policies of Medicare. Consequently, Medicare's coverage and reimbursement policies are important to our operations. CMS has established Medicare reimbursement codes describing atherectomy products and procedures using atherectomy products. We believe that physicians and hospitals that treat PAD and CAD with the respective OAS will generally be eligible to receive reimbursement from Medicare, as well as private insurers, for the cost of the single use catheter and the physician's services. 9 Competition The medical device industry is highly competitive, subject to rapid change and significantly affected by new product introductions and other activities of industry participants. The OAS compete with a variety of other products or devices for the treatment of vascular disease, including stents, balloon angioplasty catheters and atherectomy catheters, as well as products used in vascular surgery. Large competitors in the stent and balloon angioplasty market segments include Abbott Laboratories, Boston Scientific, Cook Medical, Johnson & Johnson, BARD, and Medtronic. We also compete against manufacturers of atherectomy catheters including, among others, Covidien, Spectranetics, Boston Scientific and Volcano, as well as other manufacturers that may enter the market due to the increasing demand for treatment of vascular disease. Other competitors include pharmaceutical companies that manufacture drugs for the treatment of mild to moderate PAD and CAD and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral and coronary bypass procedures. We are not aware of any competing catheter systems either currently on the market or in development that also use an orbital motion to create lumens larger than the catheter itself. Because of the size of the peripheral opportunities, competitors and potential competitors have historically dedicated significant resources to aggressively promote their products. We believe that the PAD and CAD Systems compete primarily on the basis of safety and efficacy; predictable clinical performance; availability of clinical data; ease of use; economic benefit; key opinion leader support and customer base; customer service and support; and adequate third party reimbursement. Patents and Intellectual Property We rely on a combination of patent, copyright and other intellectual property laws, trade secrets, nondisclosure agreements and other measures to protect our proprietary rights. As of July 29, 2014, we held 42 issued U.S. patents and have 46 U.S. patent applications pending, as well as 148 issued or granted foreign patents and 133 foreign patent applications, each of which corresponds to aspects of our U.S. patents and applications. Our issued U.S. patents expire between 2014 and 2032, and our most important patents, U.S. Patent No. 6,494,890 and 2 key design patents covering our eccentric abrasive crown technology are due to expire on June 1, 2019, February 16, 2024 and December 29, 2023, respectively. In addition, we have many additional patents relating to our core technology currently pending in the USPTO which will extend our key covered subject matter and coverage dates significantly. Our issued patents and patent applications relate primarily to the design and operation of interventional atherectomy devices, including the PAD Systems. These patents and applications include claims covering key aspects of orbital atherectomy devices, including the design, manufacture and therapeutic use of certain atherectomy abrasive heads, drive shafts, control systems, handles and couplings. As we continue to research and develop our atherectomy technology, we intend to file additional U.S. and foreign patent applications related to the design, manufacture and therapeutic uses of atherectomy devices. In addition, we hold 19 registered U.S. trademarks, 15 registered marks in the Madrid Protocol with protection granted within at least 1 of Australia, Europe, China, Japan and Mexico, six registered marks in Europe, five registered marks in Canada, five registered marks in Mexico, and nine registered marks in Hong Kong. We hold five trademark applications pending in the U.S, 12 trademark applications pending in Canada and 16 trademark applications pending in India. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. We seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by requiring our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors to execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. Agreements with our employees also forbid them from bringing the proprietary rights of third parties to us. We also require confidentiality or material transfer agreements from third parties that receive our confidential data or materials. Government Regulation of Medical Devices Governmental authorities in the U.S. at the federal, state and local levels and in other countries extensively regulate, among other things, the development, testing, manufacture, labeling, promotion, advertising, distribution, marketing and export and import of medical devices such as the PAD and CAD Systems. 10 Failure to obtain approval to market our products under development and to meet the ongoing requirements of these regulatory authorities could prevent us from marketing and continuing to market our products. United States The Federal Food, Drug, and Cosmetic Act ("FDCA") and the FDA implementing regulations govern medical device design and development, preclinical and clinical testing, premarket clearance or approval, registration and listing, manufacturing, labeling, storage, advertising and promotion, sales and distribution, export and import, and post market surveillance. Medical devices and their manufacturers are also subject to inspection by the FDA. The FDCA, supplemented by other federal and state laws, also provides civil and criminal penalties for violations of its provisions. We manufacture and market medical devices that are regulated by the FDA, comparable state agencies and regulatory bodies in other countries. Unless an exemption applies, each medical device we wish to commercially distribute in the U.S. will require marketing authorization from the FDA prior to distribution. The 2 primary types of FDA marketing authorization are premarket notification (also called 510(k) clearance) and premarket approval (also called PMA approval). The type of marketing authorization applicable to a device 510(k) clearance or PMA approval is generally linked to classification of the device. The FDA classifies medical devices into 1 of 3 classes (Class I, II or III) based on the degree of risk FDA determines to be associated with a device and the extent of control deemed necessary to ensure the device safety and effectiveness. Devices requiring fewer controls because they are deemed to pose lower risk are placed in Class I or II. Class I devices are deemed to pose the least risk and are subject only to general controls applicable to all devices, such as requirements for device labeling, premarket notification, and adherence to the FDA current good manufacturing practice requirements, as reflected in its Quality System Regulation ("QSR"). Class II devices are intermediate risk devices that are subject to general controls and may also be subject to special controls such as performance standards, product specific guidance documents, special labeling requirements, patient registries or post market surveillance. Class III devices are those for which insufficient information exists to assure safety and effectiveness solely through general or special controls, and include life sustaining, life supporting or implantable devices, and devices not substantially equivalent to a device that is already legally marketed. Most Class I devices and some Class II devices are exempted by regulation from the 510(k) clearance requirement and can be marketed without prior authorization from FDA. Class I and Class II devices that have not been so exempted are eligible for marketing through the 510(k) clearance pathway. By contrast, devices placed in Class III generally require PMA approval prior to commercial marketing. The PMA approval process is generally more stringent, time consuming and expensive than the 510(k) clearance process. 510(k) Clearance. To obtain 510(k) clearance for a medical device, an applicant must submit a premarket notification to the FDA demonstrating that the device is substantially equivalent to a predicate device legally marketed in the United States. A device is substantially equivalent if, with respect to the predicate device, it has the same intended use and has either (i) the same technological characteristics or (ii) different technological characteristics and the information submitted demonstrates that the device is as safe and effective as a legally marketed device and does not raise different questions of safety or effectiveness. A showing of substantial equivalence sometimes, but not always, requires clinical data. Generally, the 510(k) clearance process can exceed 90 days and may extend to a year or more. After a device has received 510(k) clearance for a specific intended use, any modification that could significantly affect its safety or effectiveness, such as a significant change in the design, materials, method of manufacture or intended use, will require a new 510(k) clearance or PMA approval (if the device as modified is not substantially equivalent to a legally marketed predicate device). The determination as to whether new authorization is needed is initially left to the manufacturer; however, the FDA may review this determination to evaluate the regulatory status of the modified product at any time and may require the manufacturer to cease marketing the modified device until 510(k) clearance or PMA approval is obtained. The manufacturer may also be subject to significant regulatory fines or penalties. We received 510(k) clearance for use of the Diamondback 360 Peripheral as a therapy in patients with PAD in the United States on August 22, 2007. We received additional 510(k) clearances for the control unit used with the Diamondback 360 Peripheral on October 25, 2007 and for the solid crown version of the Diamondback 360 Peripheral on November 9, 2007. We were granted 510(k) clearance of the Predator 360 in March 2009 and Stealth 360 in March 2011 We received 510(k) clearance of the Diamondback 360 60cm Peripheral OAS in March 2014. Premarket Approval. A PMA application requires the payment of significant user fees and must be supported by valid scientific evidence, which typically requires extensive data, including technical, preclinical, clinical and manufacturing data, to demonstrate to the FDA satisfaction the safety and efficacy of the device. A PMA application must also include a complete description of the device and its comp1nts, a detailed description of the methods, facilities and controls used to manufacture the device, and proposed labeling. After a PMA application is submitted and found to be sufficiently complete, the FDA begins 11 an in depth review of the submitted information. During this review period, the FDA may request additional information or clarification of information already provided. Also during the review period, an advisory panel of experts from outside the FDA may be convened to review and evaluate the application and provide recommendations to the FDA as to the approvability of the device. In addition, the FDA will conduct a pre approval inspection of the manufacturing facilities to ensure compliance with the FDA QSR which requires manufacturers to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures. FDA review of a PMA application is required by statute to take no longer than 180 days, although the process typically takes significantly longer, and may require several years to complete. The FDA can delay, limit or deny approval of a PMA application for many reasons, including the systems may not be safe or effective to the FDA satisfaction; the data from preclinical studies and clinical trials may be insufficient to support approval; the manufacturing process or facilities used may not meet applicable requirements; and changes in FDA approval policies or adoption of new regulations may require additional data. If the FDA evaluations of both the PMA application and the manufacturing facilities are favorable, the FDA will either issue an approval letter or an approvable letter, which usually contains a number of conditions that must be met in order to secure final approval of the PMA. When and if those conditions have been fulfilled to the satisfaction of the FDA, the agency will issue a PMA approval letter authorizing commercial marketing of the device for certain indications. If the FDA evaluation of the PMA or manufacturing facilities is not favorable, the FDA will deny approval of the PMA or issue a not approvable letter. The FDA may also determine that additional clinical trials are necessary, in which case the PMA approval may be delayed for several months or years while the trials are conducted and then the data submitted in an amendment to the PMA. Even if a PMA application is approved, the FDA may approve the device with an indication that is narrower or more limited than originally sought. The agency can also impose restrictions on the sale, distribution or use of the device as a condition of approval, or impose post approval requirements such as continuing evaluation and periodic reporting on the safety, efficacy and reliability of the device for its intended use. New PMA applications or PMA supplements may be required for modifications to the manufacturing process, labeling, device specifications, materials or design of a device that is approved through the PMA process. PMA approval supplements often require submission of the same type of information as an initial PMA application, except that the supplement is limited to information needed to support any changes from the device covered by the original PMA application and may not require as extensive clinical data or the convening of an advisory panel. The FDA granted unconditional IDE approval in April 2010 to begin the ORBIT II coronary trial in the United States. This pivotal trial was set up in 2 phases; Phase I allowed us to enroll up to 100 patients at as many as 50 U.S. sites, Phase II allowed us to expand the trial to the full complement of 429 patients. In May 2011, we received approval from the FDA to complete enrollment of 429 patients in our ORBIT II clinical trial for a coronary application for the Diamondback 360, which followed the FDA review of data from the first 50 cases in the ORBIT II trial. In July 2012, we received approval from the FDA to include the new electric coronary device (similar to Stealth 360 technology used in PAD and customized specifically for the coronary application), which improves ease of use. The FDA required 100 enrollments with the new electric coronary device and would have allowed up to 50 additional patients in the trial, as needed, to achieve that enrollment level. A total of 443 patients were enrolled in the trial. In March 2013, we completed submission of our PMA application to the FDA for our orbital atherectomy system to treat calcified coronary arteries. In October 2013, we received PMA approval from the FDA to market the Diamondback 360 Coronary OAS as a treatment for severely calcified coronary arteries. We commenced a controlled commercial launch of the CAD System following receipt of PMA approval. Clinical Trials. Clinical trials are almost always required to support a PMA application and are sometimes required for a 510(k) clearance. These trials generally require submission of an application for an IDE to the FDA. The IDE application must be supported by appropriate data, such as animal and laboratory testing results, showing that it is safe to test the device in humans and that the testing protocol is scientifically sound. The IDE application must be approved in advance by the FDA for a specified number of patients, unless the product is deemed a non significant risk device and eligible for more abbreviated IDE requirements. Generally, clinical trials for a significant risk device may begin once the IDE application is approved by the FDA and the study protocol and informed consent are approved by appropriate institutional review boards at the clinical trial sites. FDA approval of an IDE allows clinical testing to go forward but does not bind the FDA to accept the results of the trial as sufficient to prove the product safety and efficacy, even if the trial meets its intended success criteria. With certain exceptions, changes made to an investigational plan after an IDE is approved must be submitted in an IDE supplement and approved by FDA (and by governing institutional review boards when appropriate) prior to implementation. 12 All clinical trials must be conducted in accordance with regulations and requirements collectively known as good clinical practice. Good clinical practices include the FDA IDE regulations, which describe the conduct of clinical trials with medical devices, including the recordkeeping, reporting and monitoring responsibilities of sponsors and investigators, and labeling of investigation devices. They also prohibit promotion, test marketing or commercialization of an investigational device and any representation that such a device is safe or effective for the purposes being investigated. Good clinical practices also include the FDA regulations for institutional review board approval and for protection of human subjects (such as informed consent), as well as disclosure of financial interests by clinical investigators. Required records and reports are subject to inspection by the FDA. The results of clinical testing may be unfavorable or, even if the intended safety and efficacy success criteria are achieved, may not be considered sufficient for the FDA to grant approval or clearance of a product. The commencement or completion of any clinical trials may be delayed or halted, or be inadequate to support approval of a PMA application or clearance of a premarket notification for numerous reasons, including, but not limited to, the following the FDA or other regulatory authorities do not approve a clinical trial protocol or a clinical trial (or a change to a previously approved protocol or trial that requires approval), or place a clinical trial on hold; patients do not enroll in clinical trials or follow up at the rate expected; patients do not comply with trial protocols or experience greater than expected adverse side effects; institutional review boards and third party clinical investigators may delay or reject the trial protocol or changes to the trial protocol; third party clinical investigators decline to participate in a trial or do not perform a trial on the anticipated schedule or consistent with the clinical trial protocol, investigator agreements, good clinical practices or other FDA requirements; third party organizations do not perform data collection and analysis in a timely or accurate manner; regulatory inspections of the clinical trials or manufacturing facilities, which may, among other things, require corrective action or suspension or termination of the clinical trials; changes in governmental regulations or administrative actions; the interim or final results of the clinical trial are inconclusive or unfavorable as to safety or efficacy; and the FDA concludes that the trial design is inadequate to demonstrate safety and efficacy. Continuing Regulation. After a device is cleared or approved for use and placed in commercial distribution, numerous regulatory requirements continue to apply. These include establishment registration and device listing upon the commencement of manufacturing; the QSR, which requires manufacturers, including third party manufacturers, to follow design, testing, control, documentation and other quality assurance procedures during medical device design and manufacturing processes; labeling regulations, which prohibit the promotion of products for unapproved or off label uses and impose other restrictions on labeling and promotional activities; medical device reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA if a device may have caused or contributed to a death or serious injury or malfuncti1d in a way that would likely cause or contribute to a death or serious injury if malfunctions were to recur; corrections and removal reporting regulations, which require that manufacturers report to the FDA field corrections; and product recalls or removals if undertaken to reduce a risk to health posed by the device or to remedy a violation of the FDCA caused by the device that may present a risk to health. In addition, the FDA may require a company to conduct post market surveillance studies or order it to establish and maintain a system for tracking its products through the chain of distribution to the patient level. Failure to comply with applicable regulatory requirements, including those applicable to the conduct of clinical trials, can result in enforcement action by the FDA, which may lead to any of the following sanctions warning letters or untitled letters; fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; withdrawal or suspension of FDA approval; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; 13 operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; and criminal prosecution. We and our contract manufacturers, specification developers and suppliers are also required to manufacture our products in compliance with current Good Manufacturing Practice requirements set forth in the QSR. The QSR requires a quality system for the design, manufacture, packaging, labeling, storage, installation and servicing of marketed devices, and includes extensive requirements with respect to quality management and organization, device design, buildings, equipment, purchase and handling of comp1nts, production and process controls, packaging and labeling controls, device evaluation, distribution, installation, complaint handling, servicing and record keeping. The FDA enforces the QSR through periodic announced and unannounced inspections that may include the manufacturing facilities of subcontractors. If the FDA believes that we or any of our contract manufacturers or regulated suppliers is not in compliance with these requirements, it can shut down our manufacturing operations, require recall of our products, refuse to clear or approve new marketing applications, institute legal proceedings to detain or seize products, enjoin future violations or assess civil and criminal penalties against us or our officers or other employees. Any such action by the FDA would have a material adverse effect on our business. Fraud and Abuse Our operations will be directly, or indirectly through our customers, subject to various state and federal fraud and abuse laws, including, without limitation, the FDCA, federal Anti Kickback Statute and False Claims Act. These laws may impact, among other things, our proposed sales, marketing, and education programs. In addition, these laws require us to screen individuals and other companies, suppliers and vendors in order to ensure that they are not debarred by the federal government and therefore prohibited from doing business in the healthcare industry. The federal Anti Kickback Statute prohibits persons from knowingly and willfully soliciting, offering, receiving or providing remuneration, directly or indirectly, in exchange for or to induce either the referral of an individual, or the furnishing or arranging for a good or service, for which payment may be made under a federal healthcare program such as the Medicare and Medicaid programs. Several courts have interpreted the statute intent requirement to mean that if any 1 purpose of an arrangement involving remuneration is to induce referrals of federal healthcare covered business, the statute has been violated. The Anti Kickback Statute is broad and prohibits many arrangements and practices that are lawful in businesses outside of the healthcare industry. Many states have also adopted laws similar to the federal Anti Kickback Statute, some of which apply to the referral of patients for healthcare Item or services reimbursed by any source, not only the Medicare and Medicaid programs. The federal False Claims Act prohibits persons from knowingly filing or causing to be filed a false claim to, or the knowing use of false statements to obtain payment from, the federal government. Various states have also enacted laws modeled after the federal False Claims Act. In addition to the laws described above, the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 created 2 new federal crimes healthcare fraud and false statements relating to healthcare matters. The healthcare fraud statute prohibits knowingly and willfully executing a scheme to defraud any healthcare benefit program, including private payors. The false statements statute prohibits knowingly and willfully falsifying, concealing or covering up a material fact or making any materially false, fictitious or fraudulent statement in connection with the delivery of or payment for healthcare benefits, Item or services. On May 8, 2014, we received a letter from the U.S. Attorney Office for the Western District of North Carolina stating that it is investigating the Company to determine whether we had violated the False Claims Act, resulting in the submission of false claims to federal and state health care programs, including Medicare and Medicaid. The letter enclosed a Civil Investigative Demand ( CID ) for written interrogatories and document requests. We maintain rigorous policies and procedures to promote compliance with the False Claims Act and other regulatory requirements, and are working with the U.S. Attorney Office to promptly respond to the CID. However, we cannot predict when the investigation will be resolved, the outcome of this investigation or its potential impact on the Company. The federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act, or the Sunshine Act, was enacted by Congress in 2010 as part of the comprehensive health care reform legislation, and the implementing Open Payment regulations, released in February 2013, require persons to begin collecting certain data on payments and other transfers of value to physicians and teaching hospitals beginning in August 2013 for public reporting by the end of June 2014. We submitted all required information by the reporting 14 deadline. It is widely anticipated that public reporting under the Sunshine Act and implementing Open Payment regulations will result in increased scrutiny of the financial relationships between industry, physicians and teaching hospitals. Voluntary industry codes, federal guidance documents and a variety of state laws address the tracking and reporting of marketing practices relative to gifts given and other expenditures made to doctors and other healthcare professionals. In addition to impacting our marketing and educational programs, internal business processes will be affected by the numerous legal requirements and regulatory guidance at the state, federal and industry levels. International Regulation International sales of medical devices are subject to foreign government regulations, which may vary substantially from country to country. The time required to obtain approval in a foreign country may be longer or shorter than that required for FDA approval and the requirements may differ. For example, the primary regulatory environment in Europe with respect to medical devices is that of the European Union, which includes most of the major countries in Europe. Other countries, such as Switzerland, have voluntarily adopted laws and regulations that mirror those of the European Union with respect to medical devices. The European Union has adopted numerous directives and standards regulating the design, manufacture, clinical trials, labeling and adverse event reporting for medical devices. Devices that comply with the requirements of a relevant directive will be entitled to bear the CE conformity marking, indicating that the device conforms to the essential requirements of the applicable directives and, accordingly, can be commercially distributed throughout the European Union, although actual implementation of these directives may vary on a country by country basis. The method of assessing conformity varies depending on the class of the product, but normally involves a combination of submission of a design dossier, self assessment by the manufacturer, a third party assessment and, review of the design dossier by a Notified Body. This third party assessment generally consists of an audit of the manufacturer quality system and manufacturing site, as well as review of the technical documentation used to support application of the CE Mark to 1 product and possibly specific testing of the manufacturer product. An assessment by a Notified Body of 1 country within the European Union is required in order for a manufacturer to commercially distribute the product throughout the European Union. In addition, any international expansion, operations and sales that we undertake will require us to comply with the U.S. Foreign Corrupt Practices Act and similiar anti bribery laws in other jurisdictions and with U.S. and foreign export control, trade embargo and custom laws. Environmental Regulation Our operations are subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. We are currently classified and licensed as a Very Small Quantity Hazardous Waste Generator within Ramsey County, Minnesota. There are no regulated wastes requiring licensing in our Texas facility. Employees As of June 30, 2014 , we had 479 employees, including 112 employees in manufacturing, 224 employees in sales, 33 employees in marketing, 33 employees in clinical, 43 employees in general and administrative, and 34 employees in research and development, all of which are full time employees. N1 of our employees are represented by a labor union or are parties to a collective bargaining agreement, and we believe that our employee relations are good. 15 Item 1A. Risk Factors . Risks Relating to Our Business and Operations We have a history of net losses and a short commercialization experience, and we are likely to continue to incur losses. We are not profitable and have incurred net losses in each fiscal year since our formation in 1989. In particular, we had net losses of $35.3 million in fiscal 2014, $24.0 million in fiscal 2013 and $16.8 million in fiscal 2012 As of June 30, 2014, we had an accumulated deficit of approximately $238.6 million. We commenced commercial sales of the PAD Systems in September 2007 and the CAD System in October 2013, and our short commercialization experience makes it difficult for us to predict future performance. We also expect to incur significant additional expenses for sales and marketing, research and development and manufacturing as we continue to commercialize the PAD and CAD Systems and additional expenses as we seek to develop and commercialize future versions of the PAD and CAD Systems and any future products. Additionally, we expect that our general and administrative expenses will increase as our business grows. As a result, our operating losses are likely to continue. We may be unable to sustain our revenue growth. Our revenue has grown in each of the fiscal years since we commenced commercial sales of the PAD Systems in September 2007. Our ability to continue to increase our revenues in future periods will depend on our ability to increase sales of the PAD Systems and generate significant sales from the CAD System and new and improved products we introduce, which will in turn depend in part on our success in growing our customer base and reorders from those customers, and obtaining new applications for our technology. We may not be able to generate, sustain or increase revenues on a quarterly or annual basis. If we cannot achieve or sustain revenue growth for an extended period, our financial results will be adversely affected and our stock price may decline. Economic conditions may adversely affect our business. Adverse worldwide economic conditions may negatively impact our business. A significant change in the liquidity or financial condition of our customers could cause unfavorable trends in their purchases and also in our receivable collections and additional allowances may be required, which could adversely affect our operating results. Adverse worldwide economic conditions may also adversely impact our suppliers' ability to provide us with materials and comp1nts, which could adversely affect our business and operating results. The PAD Systems, the CAD System and future products may never achieve broad market acceptance. The PAD and CAD Systems and future products we may develop may never gain broad market acceptance among physicians, patients and the medical community. The degree of market acceptance of any of our products will depend on a number of factors, including the actual and perceived effectiveness and reliability of our products; the prevalence and severity of any adverse patient events involving our products; the results of any clinical trials relating to use of our products; the availability, relative cost and perceived advantages and disadvantages of alternative technologies or treatment methods for conditions treated by our products; the degree to which treatments using our products are approved for reimbursement by public and private insurers; the degree to which physicians adopt the PAD and CAD Systems; the extent to which we are successful in educating physicians about PAD and coronary artery disease in general and the existence and benefits of the PAD and CAD Systems in particular; the strength of our marketing and distribution infrastructure; and the level of education and awareness among physicians and hospitals concerning our products. Failure of the PAD and CAD Systems to significantly penetrate current or new markets would negatively impact our business, financial condition and results of operations. 16 Our customers may not be able to achieve adequate reimbursement for using the PAD and CAD Systems which could affect the acceptance of our products and cause our business to suffer. The availability of insurance coverage and reimbursement for newly approved medical devices and procedures is uncertain. The commercial success of our products is substantially dependent on whether third party insurance coverage and reimbursement for the use of such products and related services are available. We expect our products to continue to be purchased by hospitals and other providers who will then seek reimbursement from various public and private third party payors, such as Medicare, Medicaid and private insurers, for the services provided to patients. While third party payors are currently providing reimbursement for our products, we can give no assurance that these third party payors will continue to provide adequate reimbursement for use of the PAD and CAD Systems to permit hospitals and doctors to consider the products cost effective for patients requiring treatment, or that current reimbursement levels for our products will continue. In addition, the overall amount of reimbursement available for PAD and CAD treatment could decrease in the future. Failure by hospitals and other users of our products to obtain sufficient reimbursement could cause our business to suffer. Medicare, Medicaid, health maintenance organizations and other third party payors are increasingly attempting to contain healthcare costs by limiting both coverage and the level of reimbursement, and, as a result, they may not cover or provide adequate payment for use of our products. In order to position our products for acceptance by third party payors, we may have to agree to lower prices than we might otherwise charge. Governmental and private sector payors have instituted initiatives to limit the growth of healthcare costs using, for example, price regulation or controls and competitive pricing programs. Some third party payors also require demonstrated superiority, on the basis of randomized clinical trials, or pre approval of coverage, for new or innovative devices or procedures before they will reimburse healthcare providers who use such devices or procedures. It is uncertain whether our current products or any future products we may develop will be viewed as sufficiently cost effective to warrant adequate coverage and reimbursement levels. If third party coverage and reimbursement for our products is limited or not available, the acceptance of our products and, consequently, our business will be substantially harmed. Healthcare reform legislation could adversely affect our operating results and financial condition. There have been and continue to be proposals by the federal government, state governments, regulators and third party payors to control healthcare costs and, more generally, to reform the U.S. healthcare system, some of which have been enacted into law, such as the Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act, or the Patient Act. The Patient Act imposes significant new taxes on medical device makers and these taxes have begun to adversely affect our financial results. The Patient Act and any additional healthcare proposals and laws that may be enacted in the future could also limit the prices we are able to charge for our products or the amounts of reimbursement available for our products and could limit the acceptance and availability of our products. The Patient Act and future healthcare legislation could adversely affect our revenue and financial condition. Our financial performance may be adversely affected by medical device tax provisions in the health care reform legislation. The imposition of the 23% medical device excise tax enacted as part of the Patient Act has required, and will continue to require, us to identify ways to reduce spending in other areas or raise additional capital to offset the increased expense. We have not been able to pass along the cost of the tax to our customers or offset the cost of the tax through higher sales volumes resulting from the expansion of health insurance coverage, and do not expect to be able to do so in the future, because of the demographics of the current uninsured population. The regulations put forth by the U.S. Department of Treasury in late 2012 did little to lessen the burden of complying with the excise tax statute. Ongoing implementation of this legislation could have a material adverse effect on our results of operations and cash flows. We have limited data and experience regarding the safety and efficacy of the PAD and CAD Systems. Any long term data that is generated may not be positive or consistent with our limited short term data, which would affect market acceptance of these products. Because our technology is relatively new in the treatment of PAD and CAD, we have performed clinical trials only with limited patient populations. The long term effects of using the PAD and CAD Systems in a large number of patients have not been studied and the results of short term clinical use of the PAD or CAD Systems do not necessarily predict long term clinical benefits or reveal long term adverse effects. 17 Clinical trials conducted with the PAD and CAD Systems have involved procedures performed by physicians who are very technically proficient. Consequently, both short and long term results reported in these studies may be significantly more favorable than typical results achieved by physicians, which could negatively impact market acceptance of the PAD and CAD Systems and materially harm our business. We face significant competition, must innovate to stay competitive, and may be unable to sell the PAD or CAD Systems at profitable levels. The market for medical devices is highly competitive, dynamic and marked by rapid and substantial technological development and product innovation. Our ability to compete depends on our ability to innovate successfully, and while certain barriers exist to entry into our market we cannot assure that new entrants or existing competitors will not be able to develop products that compete directly with our products. We compete against very large and well known stent and balloon angioplasty device manufacturers, atherectomy catheter manufacturers, pharmaceutical companies, and companies that provide products used by surgeons in peripheral and coronary bypass procedures. We may have difficulty competing effectively with these competitors because of their well established positions in the marketplace, significant financial and human capital resources, established reputations and worldwide distribution channels. Our competitors may develop and patent processes or products earlier than we will; obtain regulatory clearances or approvals for competing medical device products more rapidly than we will; market their products more effectively than we will; or develop more effective or less expensive products or technologies that render our technology or products obsolete or non competitive. We have encountered and expect to continue to encounter potential customers who, due to existing relationships with our competitors, are committed to or prefer the products offered by these competitors. If we are unable to compete successfully, our revenue will suffer. Increased competition might lead to price reductions and other concessions that might adversely affect our operating results. Competitive pressures may decrease the demand for our products and could adversely affect our financial results. We have limited commercial manufacturing experience and could experience difficulty in producing the PAD and CAD Systems or may need to depend on third parties to manufacture the products. We have limited experience in commercially manufacturing the PAD Systems, even less experience in commercially manufacturing the CAD System and no experience manufacturing these products in the volume that we anticipate will be required if we achieve planned levels of commercial sales. As a result, we may not be able to develop and implement efficient, low cost manufacturing capabilities and processes that will enable us to manufacture the PAD and CAD Systems or future products in significant volumes, while meeting the legal, regulatory, quality, price, durability, engineering, design and production standards required to market our products successfully. The forecasts of demand we use to determine order quantities and lead times for comp1nts purchased from outside suppliers may be incorrect. Our failure to obtain required comp1nts or subassemblies when needed and at a reasonable cost would adversely affect our business. In addition, we may in the future need to depend upon third parties to manufacture the PAD and CAD Systems and future products. Any difficulties in locating and hiring third party manufacturers, or in the ability of third party manufacturers to supply quantities of our products at the times and in the quantities we need, could have a material adverse effect on our business. We depend upon third party suppliers, including single source suppliers to us and our customers, making us vulnerable to supply problems and price fluctuations. We rely on third party suppliers to provide us with certain comp1nts of our products and to provide key comp1nts or supplies to our customers for use with our products. We rely on single source suppliers for certain comp1nts of the PAD and CAD Systems. We depend on our suppliers to provide us and our customers with materials in a timely manner that meet our and their quality, quantity and cost requirements. These suppliers may encounter problems during manufacturing for a variety of reasons, any of which could delay or impede their ability to meet our demand and our customers' demands. 18 Any supply interruption from our suppliers or failure to obtain additional suppliers for any of the comp1nts used in our products would limit our ability to manufacture our products and could have a material adverse effect on our business, financial condition and results of operations. We may need to increase the size of our organization and we may experience difficulties managing growth. If we are unable to manage the anticipated growth of our business, our future revenue and operating results may be adversely affected. The growth we may experience in the future may provide challenges to our organization, requiring us to rapidly expand our sales and marketing personnel and manufacturing operations. Rapid expansion in personnel may result in less experienced people producing and selling our products, which could result in unanticipated costs and disruptions to our operations. If we cannot scale and manage our business appropriately, our anticipated growth may be impaired and our financial results will suffer. We intend to sell our products internationally in the future, but we may experience difficulties in obtaining approval to do so or in successfully marketing our products internationally even if approved. Currently, all of our revenues are in the U.S.; however, we intend to sell internationally in the future and have commenced the process of seeking approval to do so in both Europe and Japan. There can be no guarantee that we will receive approval to sell our products internationally, nor can there be any guarantee that any sales would result even if such approval is received. Additionally, movement into international markets would subject us and our products to different and increased laws and regulations, which could negatively affect our financial results and increase our regulatory expenses. We may require additional financing, and our failure to obtain additional financing when needed could force us to delay, reduce or eliminate our product development programs or commercialization efforts. We may be dependent on additional financing to execute our business plan. Additional funds may not be available when we need them on terms that are acceptable to us, or at all. In the event we need or desire additional financing, we may be unable to obtain it by borrowing m1y in the credit markets or raising m1y in the capital markets. If adequate funds are not available on a timely basis, we may terminate or delay the development of 1 or more of our products, or delay establishment of sales and marketing capabilities or other activities necessary to commercialize our products. We face a risk of non compliance with the financial covenants in our loan and security agreements with Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth. We are party to loan and security agreements with Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth. These agreements require us to maintain, among other things, a monthly specified liquidity ratio and contain customary events of default, including, among others, the failure to comply with certain covenants or other agreements. Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an event of default, amounts due under the agreements may be accelerated by Silicon Valley Bank or Partners for Growth. If we are unable to meet the financial or other covenants under the current loan and security agreements or negotiate future waivers or amendments of such covenants, events of default could occur under the agreements. Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an event of default under the agreements, Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth have available a range of remedies customary in these circumstances, including declaring all outstanding debt, together with accrued and unpaid interest thereon, to be due and payable, foreclosing on the assets securing the agreements and or ceasing to provide additional loans, which could have a material adverse effect on us. The restrictive covenants under these agreements could limit our ability to obtain future financing, withstand a future downturn in our business or the economy in general or otherwise conduct necessary corporate activities. The financial and restrictive covenants contained in the agreements could also adversely affect our ability to respond to changing economic and business conditions and place us at a competitive disadvantage relative to other companies that may be subject to fewer restrictions. Transactions that we may view as important opportunities, such as acquisitions, may be subject to the consent of Silicon Valley Bank and Partners for Growth, which consents may be withheld or granted subject to conditions specified at the time that may affect the attractiveness or viability of the transaction. 19 We are dependent on our senior management team and highly skilled personnel, and our business could be harmed if we are unable to attract and retain personnel necessary for our success. We are highly dependent on our senior management. Our success will depend on our ability to retain senior management and to attract and retain qualified personnel in the future, including scientists, clinicians, engineers and other highly skilled personnel and to integrate current and additional personnel in all departments. The loss of members of our senior management, scientists, clinical and regulatory specialists, engineers and sales personnel could prevent us from achieving our objectives of continuing to grow our company. We do not carry key person life insurance on any of our employees. Our stock price is volatile and subject to significant fluctuations. The market price of our common stock could be subject to significant fluctuations. Market prices for securities of early stage pharmaceutical, medical device, biotechnology and other life sciences companies have historically been particularly volatile. Our common stock traded as low as $18.83 and as high as $37.73 per share during the 12 month period ended June 30, 2014. Factors that may cause the market price of our common stock to fluctuate include, but are not limited to announcements of technological or medical innovations for the treatment of vascular disease; quarterly variations in our or our competitors results of operations; failure to meet estimates or recommendations by securities analysts who cover our stock; accusations that we have violated a law or regulation; sales of large blocks of our common stock, including sales by our executive officers, directors and significant stockholders; changes in accounting principles; and general market conditions and other factors, including factors unrelated to our operating performance or the operating performance of our competitors. Moreover, the stock markets in general have experienced substantial volatility that has often been unrelated to the operating performance of individual companies. These broad market fluctuations may also adversely affect the trading price of our common stock. Our ability to use our net operating loss carryforwards and certain other tax attributes may be limited. Under Sections 382 and 383 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, if a corporation undergoes an ownership change, the corporation's ability to use its pre change net operating loss carryforwards and other pre change tax attributes, such as research tax credits, to offset its post change income or taxes may be limited. In general, an ownership change will occur if there is a cumulative change in our ownership by 5 percent shareholders that exceeds 50 percentage points over a rolling 3 year period. Similar rules may apply under state tax laws. We may have experienced an ownership change in the past and we may also experience ownership changes in the future as a result of future transactions in our stock, some of which may be outside our control. As a result, if we earn net taxable income, our ability to use our pre change net operating loss carryforwards or other pre change tax attributes to offset U.S. federal and state taxable income or taxes may be subject to limitations. Risks Related to Government Regulation Our ability to market the PAD Systems in the United States is limited to use as a therapy in patients with PAD and our ability to market the CAD System in the United States is limited to use as a therapy in patients with coronary artery disease, and if we want to expand our marketing claims, we will need to file for additional FDA clearances or approvals and conduct further clinical trials, which would be expensive and time consuming and may not be successful. The PAD Systems received FDA 510(k) clearances in the United States for use as a therapy in patients with PAD, and in October 2013, we received PMA approval to use the CAD System as a therapy in patients with coronary artery disease. These general clearances and approvals restrict our ability to market or advertise the PAD Systems and the CAD System beyond these uses and could affect our growth. If we determine to market our orbital technology in the United States for other uses, we would need to conduct further clinical trials and obtain premarket approval from the FDA. Clinical trials are complex, expensive, time consuming, uncertain and subject to substantial and unanticipated delays. There is no assurance that we will be able to obtain FDA approval to use our orbital atherectomy technology for applications other than the treatment of PAD and coronary artery disease. 20 We are or will be subject to an extensive set of post market controls that apply to us as we commercialize our products, including annual PMA reports, Medical Device Reports on serious adverse events, complaint handling and analysis under the FDA's Quality System Regulation ("QSR"), export controls, advertising and promotion requirements, and potential post market studies required by the FDA. We and our suppliers are also subject to regulation by various state authorities, which may inspect our or our suppliers' facilities and manufacturing processes and enforce state regulations. Failure to comply with applicable state regulations may result in seizures, injunctions or other types of enforcement actions. Our promotion of the PAD and CAD Systems is closely controlled by the FDA and enforcement activities could limit our ability to inform potential customers of the features of the products. The PAD Systems or the CAD System may in the future be subject to product recalls that could harm our reputation and product liability claims that could exceed the limits of available insurance coverage. The FDA and similar governmental authorities in other countries have the authority to require the recall of commercialized products in the event of material regulatory deficiencies or defects in design or manufacture. For example, since commercialization of the PAD Systems, we have had minor instances of recall involving a single lot of Diamondback 360 Peripheral devices, 2 boxes of ViperWire products, and 70 lots of Stealth 360 devices, related to Use By date labeling issues; a recall of unused ViperSheath products, which we formerly distributed for Thomas Medical Products; a recall involving six lots of Stealth 360 micro crown devices due to the potential for an insufficient solder bond; a recall of 318 Diamondback 318 Coronary devices due to incorrect saline catheter specifications; and a recall involving 48 Diamondback 360 Peripheral devices due to issues with the polymer coating on the saline sheath. Any recalls of our products or products that we distribute would divert managerial and financial resources, harm our reputation with customers and have an adverse effect on our financial condition and results of operations. Also, if the PAD or CAD Systems are defectively designed, manufactured or labeled, contain defective comp1nts or are misused, we may become subject to costly litigation by our customers or their patients. The use, misuse or off label use of the PAD or CAD Systems may result in injuries that lead to product liability suits, which could be costly to our business. We cannot prevent a physician from using the PAD or CAD Systems for off label applications. While we have product liability insurance coverage for our products and intend to maintain such insurance coverage in the future, there can be no assurance that we will be adequately protected from claims that are brought against us. We are subject to many laws and governmental regulations and any adverse regulatory action may materially adversely affect our financial condition and business operations. The PAD and CAD Systems and related manufacturing processes, clinical data, adverse events, recalls or corrections and promotional activities are subject to extensive regulation by the FDA and other regulatory bodies. In particular, we are required to comply with the QSR and other regulations, which cover the methods and documentation of the design, testing, production, control, quality assurance, labeling, packaging, storage and shipping of any product for which we obtain marketing clearance or approval. We are also responsible for the quality of comp1nts received by our suppliers. Failure to comply with the QSR requirements or other statutes and regulations administered by the FDA and other regulatory bodies, or failure to adequately respond to any observations, could result in, among other things warning or other letters from the FDA; fines, injunctions and civil penalties; product recall or seizure; unanticipated expenditures; delays in clearing or approving or refusal to clear or approve products; withdrawal or suspension of approval or clearance by the FDA or other regulatory bodies; orders for physician notification or device repair, replacement or refund; operating restrictions, partial suspension or total shutdown of production or clinical trials; and criminal prosecution. If any of these actions were to occur, it would harm our reputation and cause our product sales to suffer. 21 Our operations are also subject to regulatory requirements relating to the environment, waste management and health and safety matters, including measures relating to the release, use, storage, treatment, transportation, discharge, disposal and remediation of hazardous substances. Environmental laws and regulations could become more stringent over time, imposing greater compliance costs and increasing risks and penalties associated with violations. In addition, our relationships with physicians, hospitals and the marketers of our products are subject to scrutiny under various federal anti kickback, self referral, false claims and similar laws, often referred to collectively as healthcare fraud and abuse laws, as further described below. If our operations are found to be in violation of these laws, we, as well as our employees, may be subject to penalties, including m1tary fines, civil and criminal penalties, exclusion from federal and state healthcare programs, including Medicare, Medicaid, Veterans Administration health programs, workers' compensation programs and TRICARE (the healthcare system administered by or on behalf of the U.S. Department of Defense for uniformed services beneficiaries, including active duty and their dependents, retirees and their dependents), and forfeiture of amounts collected in violation of such prohibitions, which could materially adversely affect our financial condition and business operations. We are subject to federal and state laws prohibiting kickbacks and false and fraudulent claims which, if violated, could subject us to substantial penalties. Additionally, any challenges to or investigations into our practices under these laws could cause adverse publicity and be costly to respond to, and thus could harm our business. The federal healthcare program Anti Kickback Statute, and similar state laws, prohibit payments that are intended to induce health care professionals or others either to refer patients or to purchase, lease, order or arrange for or recommend the purchase, lease or order of healthcare products or services. A number of states have enacted laws that require pharmaceutical and medical device companies to monitor and report payments, gifts and other remuneration made to physicians and other health care professionals and health care organizations. In addition, some state statutes, most notably laws in Massachusetts and Vermont, impose outright bans on certain gifts to physicians as well as requiring reporting of payments to physicians. Some of these laws, referred to as aggregate spend or gift laws, carry substantial fines if they are violated. Beginning in August 2013, the federal Physician Payments Sunshine Act, or the Sunshine Act, which was enacted by Congress in 2010 as part of the comprehensive health care reform legislation, and the implementing Open Payments regulations under the Sunshine Act, released in February 2013, require us to collect certain data on payments and other transfers of value to physicians and teaching hospitals. Public reporting of such information commenced in June 2014. It is widely anticipated that public reporting under the Sunshine Act and implementing Open Payments regulations will result in increased scrutiny of the financial relationships between industry, physicians and teaching hospitals. These anti kickback, public reporting and aggregate spend laws affect our sales, marketing and other promotional activities by limiting the kinds of financial arrangements, including sales programs, we may have with hospitals, physicians or other potential purchasers or users of medical devices. They also impose additional administrative and compliance burdens on us. In particular, these laws influence, among other things, how we structure our sales offerings, including discount practices, customer support, education and training programs and physician consulting and other service arrangements. If we were to offer or pay inappropriate inducements to purchase our products, we could be subject to a claim under the federal healthcare program Anti Kickback Statute or similar state laws. If we fail to comply with particular reporting requirements, we could be subject to penalties under applicable federal or state laws. Other federal and state laws generally prohibit individuals or entities from knowingly presenting, or causing to be presented, claims for payments to Medicare, Medicaid or other third party payors that are false or fraudulent, or for Item or services that were not provided as claimed. Although we do not submit claims directly to government healthcare programs or other payors, manufacturers can be held liable under these laws if they are deemed to cause the submission of false or fraudulent claims by providing inaccurate billing or coding information to customers, by providing improper financial inducements, or through certain other activities. In providing billing and coding information to customers, we make every effort to ensure that the billing and coding information furnished is accurate and that treating physicians understand that they are responsible for all treatment decisions. Nevertheless, we cannot provide assurance that the government will regard any billing errors that may be made as inadvertent or that the government will not examine our role in providing information to our customers and physicians concerning the benefits of therapy with our devices. Likewise, our financial relationships with customers, physicians, or others in a position to influence the purchase or use of our products may be subject to government scrutiny or be alleged or found to violate applicable fraud and abuse laws. False claims laws prescribe civil, criminal and administrative penalties for noncompliance, which can be substantial. Moreover, an unsuccessful challenge or investigation into our practices could cause adverse publicity, and be costly to respond to, and thus could harm our business and results of operations. 22 For example, on May 8, 2014, we received a letter from the U.S. Attorney Office for the Western District of North Carolina stating that it is investigating the Company to determine whether we had violated the False Claims Act, resulting in the submission of false claims to federal and state health care programs, including Medicare and Medicaid. The letter enclosed a Civil Investigative Demand ( CID ) for written interrogatories and document requests. We maintain rigorous policies and procedures to promote compliance with the False Claims Act and other regulatory requirements, and are working with the U.S. Attorney Office to promptly respond to the CID. However, we cannot predict when the investigation will be resolved, the outcome of this investigation or its potential impact on the Company. Regulations related to conflict minerals may force us to incur additional expenses, may result in damage to our business reputation and may adversely impact our ability to conduct our business. Pursuant to the Dodd Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act, the SEC promulgated final rules regarding disclosure of the use of certain minerals, known as conflict minerals, that are mined from the Democratic Republic of the Congo and adjoining countries, as well as procedures regarding a manufacturer's efforts to prevent the sourcing of such minerals and metals produced from those minerals. These disclosure requirements require ongoing due diligence efforts and disclosure on Form SD in May of each year for the prior calendar year. We filed our initial Form SD in May 2014. There are costs associated with complying with these disclosure requirements, including for diligence in regards to the sources of any conflict minerals used in our products, in addition to the cost of remediation and other changes to products, processes, or sources of supply as a consequence of such verification activities. In addition, our ongoing implementation of these rules could adversely affect the sourcing, supply, and pricing of materials used in our products. Risks Relating to Our Intellectual Property Our inability to adequately protect our intellectual property could allow our competitors and others to produce products based on our technology, which could substantially impair our ability to compete. Our success and ability to compete depends, in part, upon our ability to maintain the proprietary nature of our technologies. We rely on a combination of patents, copyrights and trademarks, as well as trade secrets and nondisclosure agreements, to protect our intellectual property. Our issued patents and related intellectual property may not be adequate to protect us or permit us to gain or maintain a competitive advantage. Also, we cannot assure you that any of our pending patent applications will result in the issuance of patents to us. Further, if any patents we obtain or license are deemed invalid and unenforceable, or have their scope narrowed, it could impact our ability to commercialize or license our technology and achieve competitive advantages. Changes in either the patent laws or in interpretations of patent laws in the United States and other countries may diminish the value of our intellectual property. In addition, the laws of some foreign countries may not protect our intellectual property rights to the same extent as the laws of the United States, if at all. We may, in the future, need to assert claims of infringement against third parties to protect our intellectual property. The outcome of litigation to enforce our intellectual property rights in patents, copyrights, trade secrets or trademarks is highly unpredictable, could result in substantial costs and diversion of resources, and could have a material adverse effect on our financial condition, reputation and results of operations regardless of the final outcome of such litigation. Despite our efforts to safeguard our unpatented and unregistered intellectual property rights, we may not be successful in doing so or the steps taken by us in this regard may not be adequate to detect or deter misappropriation of our technology or to prevent an unauthorized third party from copying or otherwise obtaining and using our products, technology or other information that we regard as proprietary. In addition, we may not have sufficient resources to litigate, enforce or defend our intellectual property rights. Additionally, third parties may be able to design around our patents. We also rely on trade secrets, technical know how and continuing innovation to develop and maintain our competitive position. In this regard, we seek to protect our proprietary information and other intellectual property by having a policy that our employees, consultants, contractors, outside scientific collaborators and other advisors execute non disclosure and assignment of invention agreements on commencement of their employment or engagement. We cannot provide any assurance that employees and third parties will abide by the confidentiality or assignment terms of these agreements, or that we will be effective in securing necessary assignments from these third parties. 23 Claims of infringement or misappropriation of the intellectual property rights of others could prohibit us from commercializing products, require us to obtain licenses from third parties or require us to develop non infringing alternatives, and subject us to substantial m1tary damages and injunctive relief. The medical technology industry is characterized by extensive litigation and administrative proceedings over patent and other intellectual property rights. The likelihood that patent infringement or misappropriation claims may be brought against us increases as we achieve more visibility in the marketplace and introduce products to market. We are aware of numerous patents issued to third parties that relate to the manufacture and use of medical devices for the treatment of vascular disease. The owners of each of these patents could assert that the manufacture, use or sale of our products infringes 1 or more claims of their patents. There could also be existing patents of which we are unaware that 1 or more aspects of our technology may inadvertently infringe. In some cases, litigation may be threatened or brought by a patent holding company or other adverse patent owner who has no relevant product revenues and against whom our patents may provide little or no deterrence. Any infringement or misappropriation claim could cause us to incur significant costs, place significant strain on our financial resources, divert management's attention from our business and harm our reputation. If the relevant patents were upheld in litigation as valid and enforceable and we were found to infringe, we could be prohibited from commercializing any infringing products unless we could obtain licenses to use the technology covered by the patent or are able to design around the patent. We may be unable to obtain a license on terms acceptable to us, if at all, and we may not be able to redesign any infringing products to avoid infringement. Item 1B. Unresolved Staff Comments. N1 Item 2 Item 2 Properties.
